California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(t) The transition to a competitive generation market should be orderly, protect electric system reliability, provide the investors in these electrical corporations with a fair opportunity to fully recover the costs associated with commission approved generation-related assets and obligations, and be completed as expeditiously as possible.

(u) The transition to expanded customer choice, competitive markets, and performance based ratemaking as described in Decision 95-12-063, as modified by Decision 96-01-009, of the Public Utilities Commission, can produce hardships for employees who have dedicated their working lives to utility employment. It is preferable that any necessary reductions in the utility workforce directly caused by electrical restructuring, be accomplished through offers of voluntary severance, retraining, early retirement, outplacement, and related benefits. Whether workforce reductions are voluntary or involuntary, reasonable costs associated with these sorts of benefits should be included in the competition transition charge.

(v) Charges associated with the transition should be collected over a specific period of time on a nonbypassable basis and in a manner that does not result in an increase in rates to customers of electrical corporations. In order to insulate the policy of nonbypassability against incursions, if exemptions from the competition transition charge are granted, a firewall shall be created that segregates recovery of the cost of exemptions as follows:

(1) The cost of the competition transition charge exemptions granted to members of the combined class of residential and small commercial customers shall be recovered only from those customers.

(2) The cost of the competition transition charge exemptions granted to members of the combined class of customers other than residential and small commercial customers shall be recovered only from those customers. The commission shall retain existing cost allocation authority provided that the firewall and rate freeze principles are not violated.

(w) It is the intent of the Legislature to require and enable electrical corporations to monetize a portion of the competition transition charge for residential and small commercial consumers so that these customers will receive rate reductions of no less than 10 percent for 1998 continuing through 2002. Electrical corporations shall, by June 1, 1997, or earlier, secure the means to finance the competition transition charge by applying concurrently for financing orders from the Public Utilities Commission and for rate reduction bonds from the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank.

(x) California’s public utility electrical corporations provide substantial benefits to all Californians, including employment and support of the state’s economy. Restructuring the electric services industry pursuant to the act that added this chapter will continue these benefits, and will also offer meaningful and immediate rate reductions for residential and small commercial customers, and facilitate competition in the supply of electric power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   Effective January 18, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

331.

The definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Aggregator” means any marketer, broker, public agency, city, county, or special district, that combines the loads of multiple end-use customers in facilitating the sale and purchase of electric energy, transmission, and other services on behalf of these customers.

(b) “Broker” means an entity that arranges the sale and purchase of electric energy, transmission, and other services between buyers and sellers, but does not take title to any of the power sold.

(c) “Direct transaction” means a contract between any one or more electric generators, marketers, or brokers of electric power and one or more retail customers providing for the purchase and sale of electric power or any ancillary services.

(d) “Fire wall” means the line of demarcation separating residential and small commercial customers from all other customers as described in subdivision (e) of Section 367.

(e) “Marketer” means any entity that buys electric energy, transmission, and other services from traditional utilities and other suppliers, and then resells those services at wholesale or to an end-use customer.

(f) “Microcogeneration facility” means a cogeneration facility of less than one megawatt.

(g) “Restructuring trusts” means the two tax-exempt public benefit trusts established by Decision 96-08-038 of the Public Utilities Commission to provide for design and development of the hardware and software systems for the Power Exchange and the Independent System Operator, respectively, and that may undertake other activities, as needed, as ordered by the commission.

(h) “Small commercial customer” means a customer that has a maximum peak demand of less than 20 kilowatts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 188.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

331.1.

For purposes of this chapter, “community choice aggregator” means any of the following entities, if that entity is not within the jurisdiction of a local publicly owned electric utility that provided electrical service as of January 1, 2003:

(a) Any city, county, or city and county whose governing board elects to combine the loads of its residents, businesses, and municipal facilities in a communitywide electricity buyers’ program.

(b) Any group of cities, counties, or cities and counties whose governing boards have elected to combine the loads of their programs, through the formation of a joint powers agency established under Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) The Kings River Conservation District, the Sonoma County Water Agency, and any California public agency possessing statutory authority to generate and deliver electricity at retail within its designated jurisdiction, provided the entity may only combine the loads of residences, businesses, and governmental facilities of cities and counties within, or contiguous to, its jurisdiction that have, by resolution exercised pursuant to paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) of Section 366.2, requested the agency to implement a community choice aggregation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

332.1.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact Item 1 (revised) on the commission’s August 21, 2000 agenda, entitled “Opinion Modifying Decision (D.) D.00-06-034 and D.00-08-021 to Regarding Interim Rate Caps for San Diego Gas and Electric Company,” as modified below.

(2) It is also the intent of the Legislature that to the extent that the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission orders refunds to electrical corporations pursuant to their findings, the commission shall ensure that any refunds are returned to customers.

(b) The commission shall establish a ceiling of six and five-tenths cents ($0.065) per kilowatthour on the energy component of electric bills for electricity supplied to residential, small commercial, and street lighting customers by the San Diego Gas and Electric Company, through December 31, 2002, retroactive to June 1, 2000. If the commission finds it in the public interest, this ceiling may be extended through December 2003 and may be adjusted as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) The commission shall establish an accounting procedure to track and recover reasonable and prudent costs of providing electric energy to retail customers unrecovered through retail bills due to the application of the ceiling provided for in subdivision (b). The accounting procedure shall utilize revenues associated with sales of energy from utility-owned or managed generation assets to offset an undercollection, if undercollection occurs. The accounting procedure shall be reviewed periodically by the commission, but not less frequently than semiannually. The commission may utilize an existing proceeding to perform the review. The accounting procedure and review shall provide a reasonable opportunity for San Diego Gas and Electric Company to recover its reasonable and prudent costs of service over a reasonable period of time.

(d) If the commission determines that it is in the public interest to do so, the commission, after the date of the completion of the proceeding described in subdivision (g), may adjust the ceiling from the level specified in subdivision (b), and may adjust the frozen rate from the levels specified in subdivision (f), consistent with the Legislature’s intent to provide substantial protections for customers of the San Diego Gas and Electric Company and their interest in just and reasonable rates and adequate service.

(e) For purposes of this section, “small commercial customer” includes, but is not limited to, all San Diego Gas and Electric Company accounts on Rate Schedule A of the San Diego Gas and Electric Company, all accounts of customers who are “general acute care hospitals,” as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, all San Diego Gas and Electric Company accounts of customers who are public or private schools for pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and all accounts on Rate Schedule AL-TOU under 100 kilowatts.

(f) The commission shall establish an initial frozen rate of six and five-tenths cents ($0.065) per kilowatthour on the energy component of electric bills for electricity supplied to all customers by the San Diego Gas and Electric Company not subject to subdivision (b), for the time period ending with the end of the rate freeze for the Pacific Gas and Electric Company and the Southern California Edison Company pursuant to Section 368, retroactive to February 7, 2001. The commission shall consider the comparable energy components of rates for comparable customer classes served by the Pacific Gas and Electric Company and the Southern California Edison Company and, if it determines it to be in the public interest, the commission may adjust this frozen rate, and may do so, retroactive to the date that rate increases took effect for customers of Pacific Gas and Electric Company and Southern California Edison Company pursuant to the commission’s March 27, 2001, decision. The commission shall determine the Fixed Department of Water Resources Set-Aside pursuant to Section 360.5 for customers subject to this section, reflecting a retail rate consistent with the rate for the energy component of electric bills as determined in this subdivision, in place of the retail rate in effect on January 5, 2001. This section shall be construed to modify the payment provisions, but may not be construed to modify the electric procurement obligations of the Department of Water Resources, pursuant to any contract or agreement in accordance with Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code, and in effect as of February 7, 2001, between the Department of Water Resources and San Diego Gas and Electric Company.

(g) The commission shall institute a proceeding to examine the prudence and reasonableness of the San Diego Gas and Electric Company in the procurement of wholesale energy on behalf of its customers, for a period beginning, at the latest, on June 1, 2000. If the commission finds that San Diego Gas and Electric Company acted imprudently or unreasonably, the commission shall issue orders that it determines to be appropriate affecting the retail rates of San Diego Gas and Electric Company customers including, but not limited to, refunds.

(h) Nothing in this section may be construed to limit the authority of the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 189.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

332.2.

Rates set by the commission that are subject to subdivision (f) of Section 332.1 may not result in any retroactive recovery of undercollections by the San Diego Gas and Electric Company. Any undercollection resulting from the retroactive rate reductions ordered pursuant to this chapter, retroactive to February 7, 2001, may not result in a revenue undercollection to San Diego Gas and Electric Company.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 2003.   See identical section, as amended by Sec. 191 of Ch. 664.)
-------------------------------------------

332.2.

Rates set by the commission that are subject to subdivision (f) of Section 332.1 may not result in any retroactive recovery of undercollections by the San Diego Gas and Electric Company. Any undercollection resulting from the retroactive rate reductions ordered pursuant to this chapter, retroactive to February 7, 2001, may not result in a revenue undercollection to San Diego Gas and Electric Company.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Oversight Board [334. - 343.]

334.

The Legislature finds and declares that in order to ensure the success of electric industry restructuring, in the transition to a new market structure it is important to ensure a reliable supply of electricity. Reliable electric service is of paramount importance to the safety, health, and comfort of the people of California. Transmission connections between electric utilities allow them to share generation resources and reduce the number of powerplants necessary to maintain a reliable system. The connections between utilities also create exposure to events that
 can cause widespread and extended transmission and service outages that reach far beyond the originating utility service area. California utilities and those in the western United States voluntarily adhere to reliability standards developed by the Western Electricity Coordinating Council. The economic cost of extended electricity outages, such as those that occurred in California and throughout the Western Electricity Coordinating Council on July 2, 1996, and August 10, 1996, to California’s residential, commercial, agricultural, and industrial customers is significant. The proposed restructuring of the electricity industry would transfer responsibility for ensuring short- and long-term reliability away from electric utilities and regulatory bodies to the Independent System Operator and various market-based mechanisms. The Legislature has an interest in ensuring that the change in the locus of responsibility for reliability does not expose California citizens to undue economic risk in connection with system
 reliability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 256.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

335.

In order to ensure that the interests of the people of California are served, a five-member Electricity Oversight Board is hereby created as provided in Section 336. For purposes of this chapter, any reference to the Oversight Board shall mean the Electricity Oversight Board. Its functions shall be all of the
 following:

(a) To oversee the Independent System Operator and the Power Exchange.

(b) To determine the composition and terms of service and to exercise the exclusive right to decline to confirm the appointments of specific members of the governing board of the Power Exchange.

(c) To serve as an appeal board for majority decisions of the Independent System Operator governing board, as they relate to matters subject to exclusive state jurisdiction, as specified in Section 339.

(d) Those members of the Power Exchange governing board whose appointments the Oversight Board has the exclusive right to decline to confirm include proposed governing board members representing agricultural end users, industrial end users, commercial end users, residential end
 users, end users at large, nonmarket participants, and public interest groups.

(e) To investigate any matter related to the wholesale market for electricity to ensure that the interests of California’s citizens and consumers are served, protected, and represented in relation to the availability of electric transmission and generation and related costs, during periods of peak demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   Also amended, in identical language, by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, effective August 8, 2002.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

336.

(a) The five-member Oversight Board shall be comprised as follows:

(1) Three members, who are California residents and electricity ratepayers, appointed by the Governor from a list jointly provided by the Energy Commission and the Public Utilities Commission, and subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(2) One member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(3) One member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(b) Legislative members shall be nonvoting members, however, they are otherwise full members
 of the board with all rights and privileges pertaining thereto.

(c) Oversight Board members shall serve three-year terms with no limit on reappointment. For purposes of the initial appointments set forth in paragraph (1), the Governor shall appoint one member to a one-year term, one to a two-year term, and one to a three-year term.

(d) The Governor shall designate one of the voting members as the chairperson of the Oversight Board who shall preside over meetings and direct the executive director in the routine administration of the Oversight Board’s business. The chairperson may designate one of the other voting members to preside over meetings in the absence of the chairperson.

(e) Two voting members shall constitute a quorum. Any decision or action of the Oversight Board shall be by majority vote of the voting
 members.

(f) The members of the Oversight Board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 16.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

337.

(a) The Independent System Operator governing board shall comprise a five-member independent governing board of directors appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the Senate. Any reference in this chapter or in any other provision of law to the Independent System Operator governing board means the independent governing board appointed under this subdivision.

(b) A member of the independent governing board appointed under subdivision (a) may not be affiliated with any actual or potential participant in any market administered by the Independent System Operator.

(c) (1) All appointments shall be for three-year terms.

(2) There is no limit on the number of terms
 that may be served by any member.

(d) The Oversight Board shall require the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the Independent System Operator to be revised in accordance with this section, and shall make filings with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission as the Oversight Board determines to be necessary.

(e) For purposes of the initial appointments to the Independent System Operator governing board, as provided in subdivision (a), the Governor shall appoint one member to a one-year term, two members to a two-year term, and two members to a three-year term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 116, Sec. 1.   (AB 825)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

338.

The Oversight Board shall have the exclusive right to approve procedures and the qualifications for Power Exchange governing board members specified in subdivision (d) of Section 335, all of whom shall be required to be electricity customers in the area served by the Power Exchange. The Power Exchange governing board shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of investor-owned electric distribution companies, publicly owned electric distribution companies, nonutility generators, public buyers and sellers, private buyers and sellers, industrial end-users,
 commercial end-users, residential end-users, agricultural end-users, public interest groups, and nonmarket participant representatives. The structural composition of the Power Exchange governing board existing on July 1, 1999, shall remain in effect until an agreement with a participating state is legally in effect. However, prior to such an agreement, California shall retain the right to change the Power Exchange governing board into a nonstakeholder board. In the event of such a legislative change, revised bylaws shall be filed with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission under Section 205 of the Federal Power Act (16 U.S.C.A. Sec. 824d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 510, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

339.

(a) The Oversight Board is the appeal board for majority decisions of the Independent System Operator governing board relating to matters that are identified in subdivision (b) as they pertain to the Independent System Operator.

(b) The following matters are subject to California’s exclusive jurisdiction:

(1) Selections by California of governing board members, as described in Sections 335, 337, and 338.

(2) Matters pertaining to retail electric service or retail sales of electric energy.

(3) Ensuring that the purposes and functions of the Independent System Operator and Power Exchange are consistent with the purposes and functions of California nonprofit public benefit corporations, including duties of care and conflict of interest standards for directors of the corporations.

(4) State functions assigned to the Independent System Operator and Power Exchange under state law.

(5) Open meeting standards and meeting notice requirements.

(6) Appointment of advisory representatives representing state interests.

(7) Public access to
 corporate records.

(8) The amendment of bylaws relevant to these matters. 

(c) Only members of the Independent System Operator governing board may appeal a majority decision of the Independent System Operator related to any of the matters specified in subdivision (b) to the Oversight Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 510, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

340.

The Oversight Board shall take the steps that are necessary to ensure the earliest possible incorporation of the Independent System Operator and the Power Exchange as separately incorporated public benefit, nonprofit corporations under the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

341.

The Oversight Board may do all of the following:

(a) Meet at the times and places it may deem proper.

(b) Accept appropriations, grants, or contributions from any public source, private foundation, or individual.

(c) Sue and be sued.

(d) Contract with state, local, or federal agencies for services or work required
 by the Oversight Board.

(e) Contract for or employ any services or work required by the Oversight Board that in its opinion cannot satisfactorily be performed by its staff or by other state agencies.

(f) Appoint advisory committees from members of other public agencies and private groups or individuals.

(g) As a body, or on the authorization of the Oversight Board, as a subcommittee composed of one or more members, hold hearings at the times and places it may deem proper.

(h) Issue subpoenas to compel the production of books, records, papers, accounts, reports, and documents and the attendance of witnesses.

(i) Administer oaths.

(j) Adopt or amend rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, and to govern the procedures of the Oversight Board.

(k) Exercise any authority consistent with this chapter delegated to it by a federal agency or authorized to it by federal law.

(l) Make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature at the time or times the Oversight Board deems necessary.

(m) Participate in proceedings relevant to the purposes of this chapter or to the purposes of Division 4.9 (commencing with Section 9600) or, as part of any coordinated effort by the state, participate in activities to promote the formation of interstate agreements to enhance the reliability and function of the electricity system and the electricity market.

(n) Do any and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

341.1.

Regulations adopted within 120 days of the effective date of this section may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

341.2.

The Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) applies to meetings of the Oversight Board. In addition to the allowances of that act, the Oversight Board may hold a closed session to consider the appointment of one or more candidates to the governing board of the Power Exchange, deliberate on matters involving the removal of a member of the governing board of the Power Exchange, or to consider a matter based on information that has received a grant of confidential
 status pursuant to regulations of the Oversight Board, provided that any action taken on such a matter shall be taken by vote in an open session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 766, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

341.3.

Voting members of the Oversight Board shall be required to file financial disclosure statements with the Fair Political Practices Commission. The appointing authority for voting members shall avoid appointing persons with conflicts of interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 261, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

341.4.

The Oversight Board shall appoint, and fix the salary of, an executive director who shall have charge of administering the affairs of the Oversight Board, including entering into contracts, subject to the direction and policies of the Oversight Board. Notwithstanding Sections 11042 and 11043 of the Government Code, the Oversight Board shall appoint an attorney who shall advise the Oversight Board and each member and represent the Oversight Board as a party in any state or federal action or proceeding related to the purposes of this chapter or to an action of the
 Oversight Board and who shall perform generally all the duties of attorney to the Oversight Board. For purposes of this section, the Oversight Board may appoint a person exempt pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution. The executive director shall, in accordance with Article VII of the California Constitution and subject to the approval of the Oversight Board, appoint employees as may be necessary to carry out the Oversight Board’s duties and responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 261, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

341.5.

(a) The Independent System Operator and Power Exchange bylaws shall contain provisions that identify those matters specified in subdivision (b) of Section 339 as matters within state jurisdiction. The bylaws shall also contain provisions which state that California’s bylaws approval function with respect to the matters specified in subdivision (b) of Section 339 shall not preclude the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission from taking any action necessary to address undue discrimination or other violations of the Federal Power Act (16 U.S.C.A.
 Sec. 791a et seq.) or to exercise any other commission responsibility under the Federal Power Act. In taking any such action, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission shall give due respect to California’s jurisdictional interests in the functions of the Independent System Operator and Power Exchange and to attempt to accommodate state interests to the extent those interests are not inconsistent with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission’s statutory responsibilities. The bylaws shall state that any future agreement regarding the apportionment of the Independent System Operator and Power Exchange board appointment function among participating states associated with the expansion of the Independent System Operator and Power Exchange into multistate entities shall be filed with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission pursuant to Section 205 of the Federal Power Act (16 U.S.C.A. Sec. 824d).

(b) Any necessary bylaw changes to implement the
 provisions of Section 335, 337, 338, 339, or subdivision (a) of this section, or changes required pursuant to an agreement as contemplated by subdivision (a) of this section with a participating state for a regional organization, shall be effective upon approval of the respective governing boards and the Oversight Board and acceptance for filing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 510, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

343.

(a) The Attorney General shall represent the Department of Finance and shall succeed to, and may exercise, all rights, claims, powers, and entitlements of the Electricity Oversight Board in any litigation or settlement to obtain ratepayer recovery for the effects of the 2000–02 energy crisis. This section does not require the Attorney General to litigate any claim, or take any other action, as successor to the Electricity Oversight Board.

(b) The Attorney General shall not distribute or expend the proceeds of any settlements of claims described in subdivision (a), except in accordance with Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 16428.1) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Division 27 (commencing with Section
 80000) of the Water Code.

(c) The Attorney General shall not distribute or expend the proceeds of any settlements of claims allocated to the Electricity Oversight Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Independent System Operator [345. - 352.7.]

345.

(a) The Independent System Operator shall ensure the efficient use and reliable operation of the transmission grid consistent with the achievement of planning and operating reserve criteria that are no less stringent than those established by the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and the North American Electric Reliability Council.

(b) In furtherance of subdivision (a), the Independent System Operator may amend its tariff, as deemed necessary and subject to approval by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission through its rulemaking process, to be consistent with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 713, Sec. 2.   (AB 2368)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

345.1.

The chair of the board of governors and the chief executive officer of the Independent System Operator shall appear annually before the appropriate policy committees of the Assembly and Senate to present the report required pursuant to Section 345.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 116, Sec. 2.   (AB 825)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

345.2.

(a) The Independent System Operator shall develop, publish, and annually update a report that includes all of the following information:

(1) Any changes to its federal tariff sought, and those changes approved, by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(2) The status of policy initiatives and recurring processes considered by the Independent System Operator during the prior year.

(3) Actions undertaken by the Independent System Operator governing board and, if applicable, the governing board of an independent regional organization whose electricity market California entities participate in.

(4) An assessment of market activity during the prior year by any independent market monitor and, if applicable, independent market analysis maintained by an independent regional organization used by the Independent System Operator.

(5) Actions undertaken within the transmission planning process of the Independent System Operator and the implementation of projects approved in that process.

(b) If the Independent System Operator uses a voluntary energy market governed by an independent regional organization, that organization shall provide the Independent System Operator with the information required for the report required by this section, as applicable.

(c) (1) The Independent System Operator shall submit the report required pursuant
 to subdivision (a) to the Governor and the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than February 1 of each year.

(2) The Independent System Operator shall post the report in a conspicuous area of its internet website and shall have a program to disseminate the information in the report using computer mailing lists to provide regular updates on the information to those members of the public and organizations that request that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 116, Sec. 3.   (AB 825)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

345.5.

(a) The Independent System Operator, as a nonprofit, public benefit corporation, shall conduct its operations consistent with applicable state and federal laws and consistent with the interests of the people of the state.

(b) To ensure the reliability of electric service and the health and safety of the public, the Independent System Operator shall manage the transmission grid and related energy markets in a manner that is consistent with all of the following:

(1) Making the most efficient use of available energy resources. For purposes of this section, “available energy resources” include energy, capacity, ancillary
 services, and demand bid into markets administered by the Independent System Operator. “Available energy resources” do not include a schedule submitted to the Independent System Operator by an electrical corporation or a local publicly owned electric utility to meet its own customer load.

(2) Reducing, to the extent possible, overall economic cost to the state’s consumers.

(3) Applicable state law intended to protect the public’s health and the environment.

(4) Maximizing availability of existing electric generation resources necessary to meet the needs of the state’s electricity consumers.

(5) Conducting internal operations in a manner that minimizes cost
 impact on ratepayers to the extent practicable and consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(6) Communicating with all balancing area authorities in California in a manner that supports electrical reliability.

(c) The Independent System Operator shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult and coordinate with appropriate state and local agencies to ensure that the Independent System Operator operates in furtherance of state law regarding consumer and environmental protection.

(2) Ensure that the purposes and functions of the Independent System Operator are consistent with the purposes and functions of nonprofit, public benefit corporations in the
 state, including duties of care and conflict-of-interest standards for officers and directors of a corporation.

(3) Maintain open meeting standards and meeting notice requirements consistent with the general policies of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and affording the public the greatest possible access, consistent with other duties of the corporation. The Independent System Operator’s Open Meeting Policy, as adopted on April 23, 1998, and in effect as of May 1, 2002, meets the requirements of this paragraph. The Independent System Operator shall maintain a policy that is no less consistent with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act than its policy in effect as of May 1, 2002.

(4) Provide public access to corporate records consistent with the general policies of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and affording the public the greatest possible access, consistent with the other duties of the corporation. The Independent System Operator’s Information Availability Policy,
 as adopted on October 22, 1998, and in effect as of May 1, 2002, meets the requirements of this paragraph. The Independent System Operator shall maintain a policy that is no less consistent with the California Public Records Act than its policy in effect as of May 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 395.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

345.6.

(a) Notwithstanding the requirements related to energy markets in subdivision (b) of Section 345.5, the Independent System Operator and the electrical corporations that are participating transmission owners whose transmission systems are operated by the Independent System Operator may use voluntary energy markets governed by an independent regional organization only if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The independent regional organization is a nonprofit corporation whose governance documents, and the tariff approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, include a requirement to respect the authority of each state that has a load-serving entity or balancing authority participating in the market to set its own
 procurement, resource adequacy, environmental, reliability, and other public interest policies and exercise oversight over its regulated entities.

(2) The governing board of the independent regional organization maintains a public policy committee consisting of members of the governing board of the independent regional organization that engages with states, local power authorities, and federal power marketing administrations about potential impacts to state, local, or federal policies before it approves a tariff change for filing at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(3) The governing board of the independent regional organization maintains a relationship with and seeks input from a body of state regulators or similar body to receive the views of state regulators.

(4) The independent regional organization
 makes funding available for a consumer advocate organization that represents the interests of one or more consumer advocate offices authorized in state law, including the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, and facilitates engagement by those offices with the independent regional organization.
